Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 2. Drinking Water Standards

§ 35-4-220.
Definitions.

The following words as used in this act [§§

35-4-220

through

35-4-223

], unless a different meaning is required by the context or is specifically prescribed, shall have the following meaning:

“Service connection” shall mean and include any water line or pipe connected to a distribution supply main or pipe for the purpose of conveying water to a building or dwelling;

“Sanitary public water supply” shall mean and include any water supply being distributed by ten (10) or more service connections, such connections being utilized to furnish water for human consumption either in preparing foods or beverages for inhabitants of residences or business establishments;

“United States public health service drinking water standards” shall mean and include the standards prescribed by the United States public health service for the quality of water on interstate carriers, provided further that the section of these standards pertaining to physical and chemical characteristics of water shall not be included in these standards for the purpose of this act.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 222, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-197.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-4-221.
Periodical bacteriological analysis of water required.

It shall be the duty and responsibility of any public or private utility engaged in the development, storage and distribution of a sanitary public water supply to provide for the safety and purity of such supply to every service connection and to collect samples of such water for bacteriological analysis at least once monthly or oftener as required by the state board of health. Such collection shall be made in special containers furnished for this purpose by the state health department division of laboratories and shall be returned to this laboratory for examination. Such examination and reporting of results shall comply with the procedures outlined in the United States public health service drinking water standards. The results of such analysis shall be reported to the owners or persons responsible for the operation of the sanitary public water supply.

When the water from such water supply has been determined by laboratory examination, inspection and report of the state department of health to be unsafe for human consumption as determined by the United States public health service drinking water standards, the owners or persons responsible for the operation of such water supply shall take immediate action to correct sanitary defects, improve operation, provide necessary water treatment, or make any other changes or additions necessary to provide assuredly safe water.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 222, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-198; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to inspection of water supply generally, see §

35-1-225

.

Editor's notes. —

The division of laboratories of the state health department no longer exists. See §

9-2-101

.

§ 35-4-222.
Notice of danger to health.

Whenever, in the opinion of the state department of health, investigations indicate that the water from a water supply as described in this act [§§

35-4-220

through

35-4-223

] would endanger the health of the water consumers, the department shall give written notice to the owners or persons responsible for the operation of such sanitary public water supply, specifying the cause of the danger to the health of the water consumers.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 222, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-199; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-4-223.
Liability for damages.

Compliance with the requirements of this act [§§

35-4-220

through

35-4-223

] shall in no way release the owners or persons responsible for the operation of a sanitary public water supply from any liability for damage to persons or property caused by or resulting from the installation, operation or maintenance of a sanitary public water supply.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 222, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-200.

§ 35-4-224.
Standards for mobile home parks eliminated.

The department of health has no authority to regulate, or to promulgate or enforce rules, regulations or standards regulating the design and construction of sewerage and water facilities within a mobile home park. This does not preclude the department from promulgating and enforcing rules and regulations or standards regulating the health of persons within a mobile home park and inspecting sewerage and water facilities within a mobile home park upon completion of the construction of such facilities.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 146, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.